sk-SK: Materiál krycej dosky oktávovej harmoniky: Hliník; Mosadz; Pochrómovaná oceľ; Poniklovaná oceľ; Plast/ABS; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iný
pt-BR: Material das placas de cobertura da gaita de oitavas: Alumínio; Latão; Aço banhado a cromo; Aço banhado a níquel; Plástico/ABS; Aço inoxidável; Outro
en: Octave harmonica cover plate material: Aluminum; Brass; Chrome-plated steel; Nickel-plated steel; Plastic/ABS; Stainless steel; Other
it: Materiale della piastra di copertura dell'armonica a ottave: Alluminio; Ottone; Acciaio cromato; Acciaio nichelato; Plastica/ABS; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
sl-SI: Material pokrovne plošče oktavne ustne harmonike: Aluminij; Medenina; Kromirano jeklo; Ponikljano jeklo; Plastika/ABS; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
lt-LT: Oktavinės lūpinės armonikėlės dangtelio plokštelės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Chromuotas plienas; Nikeliuotas plienas; Plastikas / ABS; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
zh-CN: 八度口琴盖板材质: 铝制; 黄铜; 镀铬钢; 镀镍钢; 塑料/ABS; 不锈钢; 其他
nb: Materiale i dekkplate for oktavt munnspill: Aluminium; Messing; Forkrommet stål; Forniklet stål; Plast/ABS; Rustfritt stål; Annet
ro-RO: Materialul plăcii de acoperire pentru muzicuța octavă: Aluminiu; Alamă; Oțel cromat; Oțel nichelat; Plastic/ABS; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
ja: オクターブハーモニカカバープレート素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; クロムメッキ鋼; ニッケルメッキ鋼; プラスチック/ABS; ステンレス鋼; その他
el: Υλικό πλακών κάλυψης φυσαρμόνικας οκτάβας: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Επιχρωμιωμένος χάλυβας; Επινικελωμένος χάλυβας; Πλαστικό/ABS; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material da placa de cobertura da harmónica de oitava: Alumínio; Latão; Aço cromado; Aço niquelado; Plástico/ABS; Aço inoxidável; Outro
de: Material der Oktav-Mundharmonika-Abdeckplatten: Aluminium; Messing; Verchromter Stahl; Vernickelter Stahl; Kunststoff/ABS; Edelstahl; Andere
ko: 옥타브 하모니카 커버 플레이트 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 크롬 도금 강철; 니켈 도금 강철; 플라스틱/ABS; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
pl: Materiał płyty obudowy harmonijki oktawowej: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Stal chromowana; Stal niklowana; Plastik/ABS; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
cs: Materiál krycí desky oktávové harmoniky: Hliník; Mosaz; Pochromovaná ocel; Poniklovaná ocel; Plast/ABS; Nerezová ocel; Ostatní
tr: Oktav mızıkası kapak plakası malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Krom kaplama çelik; Nikel kaplama çelik; Plastik/ABS; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำฝาครอบฮาร์โมนิกาประเภทอ็อกเทฟ: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; เหล็กชุบโครเมียม; เหล็กชุบนิกเกิล; พลาสติก/ABS; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
vi: Chất liệu tấm ốp kèn harmonica Octave: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Thép mạ crom; Thép mạ niken; Nhựa/ABS; Thép không gỉ; Khác
sv: Munspelsskalets material: Aluminium; Mässing; Förkromat stål; Förnicklat stål; Plast/ABS; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
bg-BG: Материал на капака на октавната хармоника: Алуминий; Месинг; Хромирана стомана; Никелирана стомана; Пластмаса/ABS; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
hu: Oktáv szájharmonika fedőlemez anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Krómozott acél; Nikkelezett acél; Műanyag / ABS; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
da: Materiale for oktavstemt mundharmonikas dækplade: Aluminium; Messing; Forkromet stål; Forniklet stål; Plast/ABS; Rustfrit stål; Andet
fi: Oktaavihuuliharpun peitelevyn materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Kromattu teräs; Niklattu teräs; Muovi/ABS; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
ru: Материал крышек октавной гармоники: Алюминий; Латунь; Хромированная сталь; Никелированная сталь; Пластик / АБС; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
nl: Afdekmateriaal octaafharmonica: Aluminium; Messing; Verchroomd staal; Vernikkeld staal; Plastic/ABS; Roestvrij staal; Overig
hr-HR: Materijal pokrovne ploče oktavne harmonike: Aluminij; Mjed; Kromirani čelik; Poniklani čelik; Plastika/ABS; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
es: Material de las placas de cubierta de la armónica de octavas: Aluminio; Latón; Acero cromado; Acero niquelado; Plástico/ABS; Acero inoxidable; Otro
fr: Matériau de la plaque de recouvrement de l'harmonica Octave: Aluminium; Laiton; Acier chromé; Acier nickelé; Plastique/ABS; Acier inoxydable; Autre
zh-TW: 重音口琴蓋板材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 鍍鉻鋼; 鍍鎳鋼; 塑膠/ABS; 不鏽鋼; 其他